Washington statutes.
RCW 19.100.250

Powers of director as to rules, forms, orders and defining terms—Interpretive opinions.

The director may from time to time make, amend, and rescind such rules, forms, and orders as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter including rules and forms governing applications and reports and defining any terms whether or not used in this chapter insofar as the definitions are consistent with this chapter. The director in his or her discretion may honor requests from interested persons for interpretive opinions.

[ 2011 c 336 s 565; 1972 ex.s. c 116 s 15; 1971 ex.s. c 252 s 25.]